Wyoming, session 2025, HB0075.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-14-104(a)(intro) and (iv) and
39-14-111(a) are amended to read:
39-14-104. Tax rate.
(a) The total severance tax rate for surface coal
shall be six and one-half percent (6.5%) six percent (6%).
This rate comprises one and one-half percent (1.5%) imposed
by Wyoming constitution article 15, section 19, and five
percent (5%) four and one-half percent (4.5%) imposed
statutorily. The tax shall be distributed as provided in
W.S. 39-14-111 and is imposed as follows:
(iv) One and one-half percent (1.5%) One percent
(1%); plus
39-14-111. Distribution.
(a) As provided by W.S. 39-14-104(a), the total
severance tax rate for surface coal shall be six and
one-half percent (6.5%) six percent (6%). As provided by
W.S. 39-14-104(b), the total severance tax rate for
underground coal shall be three and three-quarters percent
(3.75%). A one and one-half percent (1.5%) tax imposed by
W.S. 39-14-104(a)(i) and a one and one-half percent (1.5%)
tax imposed by W.S. 39-14-104(b)(i) shall be deposited into
the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund. All other taxes
imposed by W.S. 39-14-104(a) and (b) shall be deposited
into the severance tax distribution account.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0075
ENROLLED ACT NO. 11, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2